West Virginia, session 2026, SB649.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-20. Medicaid program; chronic kidney disease and hypertension; evaluation and classification; blood pressure monitors. (a) Any enrollee in Medicaid who is eligible for services and who has a diagnosis of diabetes or hypertension or who has a family history of kidney disease, shall receive coverage for an evaluation for chronic kidney disease through routine clinical laboratory assessments of kidney function.(b) Any enrollee in Medicaid who is eligible for services and who has been diagnosed with diabetes or hypertension or who has a family history of kidney disease and who has received a diagnosis of kidney disease shall be classified as a chronic kidney patient.(c) The diagnostic criteria used to define chronic kidney disease should be those generally recognized through clinical practice guidelines which identify chronic kidney disease or its complications, based on the presence of kidney damage and level of kidney function.(d) Medicaid providers shall be educated by the Bureau for Public Health in an effort to increase the rate of evaluation and treatment for chronic kidney disease. Providers should be made aware of:(1) Managing risk factors, which prolong kidney function or delay progression to kidney replacement therapy;(2) Managing risk factors for bone disease and cardiovascular disease associated with chronic kidney disease;(3) Improving nutritional status of chronic kidney disease patients; and(4) Correcting anemia associated with chronic kidney disease.(e) In the event that Rural Health Transformation Program funding for self-measured blood pressure validated devices has been expended, a Medicaid enrollee who is eligible for services shall receive a self-measured blood pressure validated device: Provided, That the enrollee is pregnant or within the 12-month post-partum pregnancy time frame and has been diagnosed with uncontrolled hypertension.(f) In accordance with the Rural Health Transformation Program, the Bureau for Medical Services shall draft a state plan amendment to include coverage for home blood pressure monitoring which shall have specific requirements for the following:(1) Providing coverage for a self-measured blood pressure device validated by the United States Blood Pressure Validated Listing;(2) Providing coverage for an extra blood pressure cuff; and (3) Providing reimbursement for a self-measured blood pressure validated device and related services; including, but not limited to, training patients, interpretation of readings, and the costs of delivering co-interventions.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home